Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-1148
Children with disabilities; regional networks, schools, or centers; authorized.

The department is authorized to set up one or more statewide regional networks, approved schools, or centers for children with disabilities. Any such regional network, school, or center may offer residential facilities or services for such children, and such services shall be under the control and supervision of the department.

Laws 1957, c. 388, § 1, p. 1347;

R.R.S.1943, § 83-246;

Laws 1961, c. 209, § 1, p. 624;

Laws 1972, LB 690, § 9;

Laws 1978, LB 871, § 28;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 43-617;

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 37;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3337;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 830;

Laws 1997, LB 346, § 34;

Laws 1999, LB 813, § 46;

Laws 2009, LB549, § 41;

Laws 2019, LB675, § 36.